District of Columbia statutes.
29-603.01

Partner agent of partnership.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under § 29-603.03:

(1)

Each partner shall be an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business.

(2)

An act of a partner, including the execution of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership shall bind the partnership, unless the partner had no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom the partner was dealing knew or had received a notification that the partner lacked authority.

(3)

An act of a partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership shall bind the partnership only if the act was authorized by the other partners.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-603.02, § 29-604.01, § 29-607.02, § 29-608.04, and § 29-608.05.
2001 Ed., § 33-103.01.
1981 Ed., § 41-153.1.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 301 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).